California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
The commission may carry insurance in such amount as it deems proper to cover any accident or destruction, in part or in whole, to any toll bridge or other highway crossing, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities until all bonds sold for the acquisition or construction of the toll bridge or other highway crossing, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities and interest accrued thereon have been fully redeemed and paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 198.)
-------------------------------------------

30452.

All money collected on any indemnity bond or insurance policy as the result of any damage or injury to any such toll bridge or other highway crossing, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities shall be used for the purpose of repairing or rebuilding the toll bridge or other highway crossing, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities, as long as there are revenue bonds against any such structure outstanding and unredeemed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30453.

The commission may also carry insurance or indemnity bonds insuring against the loss of tolls or other revenues to be derived from any toll bridge or other highway crossing, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities by reason of any interruption in the use of the toll bridge or other highway crossing, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities from any cause whatever.

The proceeds of the insurance or indemnity bonds shall be paid into the fund into which the tolls and other revenues of the bridge or other highway crossing, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities so insured are required to be paid and shall be applied to the same purposes and in the same manner as other money in the fund.

The insurance or indemnity bonds may be in an amount equal to the probable tolls and other revenues to be received from the operation of the toll bridge or other highway crossing, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities during any period of time determined upon by the commission and fixed in its discretion, and may be paid for out of the toll revenue fund as specified in the proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 199.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Local Cooperation [30500. - 30506.]

30500.

Any city, county, district, or political subdivision of the state, upon the request of the department or of the commission, may advance or contribute money, rights-of-way, labor, materials, and other property toward the expense of building, acquiring, and maintaining the toll bridge or other highway crossing, and the transportation facilities thereof and thereto referred to in this chapter, and for preliminary surveys and the preparation of plans and estimates of cost thereof and other preliminary expenses. Appropriations for such purposes may be made from any funds available, including highway funds received from the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 200.)
-------------------------------------------

30501.

Any city, county, district, or political subdivision of the State may issue general obligation bonds for any of the purposes enumerated in this article. All proceedings for the authorization, issue, and sale of such bonds shall be had under the law governing the issue and sale of bonds for public improvements by the particular political subdivision or public corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30502.

Money or property advanced or contributed pursuant to this article may be immediately transferred or delivered to the department or to the commission to be used for the purpose for which the advance or contribution was made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 201.)
-------------------------------------------

30503.

The commission may enter into a binding agreement with any city, county, district, or political subdivision of the state to repay any money or the value of any rights-of-way, labor, materials, or other property advanced or contributed toward the expense of acquiring or constructing any toll bridge or other highway crossing, or the transportation facilities thereof or thereto, acquired or constructed pursuant to this chapter, but no repayment therefor shall be made until all obligations issued by the commission for the acquisition or construction of the toll bridge or other highway crossing, and the transportation facilities thereof or thereto, have been fully redeemed and paid, and then only out of the tolls and revenues received from the operation of the toll bridge or other highway crossing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 202.)
-------------------------------------------

30504.

The collection of tolls shall be continued on any particular toll bridge or other highway crossing until all bonds issued pursuant to this chapter for the acquisition or construction of the toll bridge or other highway crossing or the transportation facilities thereof or thereto are fully redeemed and paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30505.

After all bonds issued pursuant to this chapter for the acquisition or construction of any toll bridge or other highway crossing and the transportation facilities thereof or thereto have been fully redeemed and paid, the commission may continue to collect tolls and other revenues for the use of the toll bridge or other highway crossing for the purpose of reimbursing the state for any expenditures which have been made by it in connection with the toll bridge or other highway crossing, and the transportation facilities thereof or thereto, and for the purpose of repayment to any city, county, district, or political subdivision of the state of any amount the commission has agreed to repay for money, rights-of-way, labor, materials, or other property advanced or contributed for the acquisition or construction of the toll bridge or other highway crossing or transportation facilities thereof or thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 203.)
-------------------------------------------

30506.

Any city, county, incorporated bridge and highway district, or joint highway district may, by proper resolution of its governing body, petition the commission requesting the commission to authorize the acquisition or construction of any toll bridge or other toll highway crossing across any waters, bays, arms of bays, rivers, or streams wholly within, or bordering upon, or wholly without the limits of any such political subdivision or public corporation.

If the commission refuses to authorize the acquisition or construction of the proposed toll bridge or other toll highway crossing, or if the commission does not within three years from the receipt of the petition authorize the acquisition or construction of the toll bridge or other toll highway crossing, the city, county, bridge and highway district, or joint highway district, either singly or in conjunction with other cities, counties, bridge and highway districts, or joint highway districts, may acquire or construct the toll bridge or other toll highway crossing, subject to the limitations of Article 7 (commencing with Section 30350).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 204.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Particular Highway Crossings [30600. - 30796.10.]



  ARTICLE 1. San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge [30600. - 30610.]

30600.

As used in this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Authority” means the Bay Area Toll Authority created pursuant to Chapter 4.3 (commencing with Section 30950).

(b) “Toll bridge” means that certain bridge across San Francisco Bay known as the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge and the approaches thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30601.

The toll bridge and the approaches to it are a primary state highway. No law providing that state highways shall be free highways affects the power or duty of the authority to fix the rates of toll for the toll bridge or the power and duty of the department to collect the tolls so fixed by the authority for the use of the toll bridge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30602.

The department shall permanently maintain and operate the toll bridge as a primary state highway in such a manner that the physical condition and operating efficiency thereof shall be of the highest character.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30604.

The department shall at all times cause the toll bridge to comply with all lawful orders of the United States Secretary of Defense, the Chief of Engineers of the United States Army, and of any other governmental agency or authority having jurisdiction thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30604.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, local and state permitting authorities shall not impose any requirement that a bicycle, pedestrian, or mass transit facility be constructed on the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge as a condition for issuing any permit, granting any easement, or granting any other form of approval needed, for the construction of a new bridge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 327, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

30606.

The cost of operating and maintaining the architectural lights on the toll bridge shall be paid by the department from toll bridge revenue funds available for the operation of the toll bridge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30610.

Expenditures for maintenance and operation of the Terminal Building in San Francisco shall be proper charges against the revenues of the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1592.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. San Pedro-Terminal Island Bridge [30680. - 30685.]

30680.

As used in this article, “toll bridge” means a toll bridge, with at least four lanes, across Los Angeles Harbor from San Pedro at or near Boschke Slough to Terminal Island, and the approaches thereto.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1958, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 74.)
-------------------------------------------

30682.

For the purpose of providing funds for all engineering, traffic, and financial studies and expenses in connection with the financing and the preparation of the necessary surveys, plans, specifications, and estimates of cost for the construction of the toll bridge, and for the purpose of providing such additional funds, over and above the amount which can be raised through the issuance of revenue bonds, as may be necessary in order to complete the financing of the toll bridge, the commission may, from time to time, direct the State Controller to transfer to the commission, for expenditure by the department, the following amounts:

(a) From money in the State Highway Account required to be expended for the construction of state highways in the County of Los Angeles pursuant to former Section 188.4, as repealed by Chapter 1386 of the Statutes of 1963, a sum sufficient to complete the project over and above the amounts made available from the proceeds of revenue bonds and the amounts made available in subdivisions (b) and (c).

(b) Not to exceed the total of two million dollars ($2,000,000) from money in the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund available for apportionment to the County of Los Angeles. Any amount so transferred shall be deemed to be in the Highway Users Tax Account for the purpose of making the apportionments from that account, but the amount payable to the County of Los Angeles from the Highway Users Tax Account shall be reduced by an amount equal to the transfers so made.

(c) Not to exceed the total of two million dollars ($2,000,000) from money in the State Highway Account available for allocation and expenditure for city streets within the City of Los Angeles pursuant to Section 2107. Any amount so transferred shall be deemed to be in the State Highway Account for the purpose of making the allocations mentioned in Section 2107, but the amount expended from the State Highway Account for city streets within the City of Los Angeles shall be reduced by an amount equal to the transfers so made.

Of the first nine million dollars ($9,000,000) required for the purpose of completing the project over and above the amount available from the sale of revenue bonds, the transfer shall be made from the above sources as follows:

Five-ninths from the State Highway Account, two-ninths from the funds mentioned in subdivision (b) and two-ninths from the amounts mentioned in subdivision (c). Additional necessary amounts shall be transferred from the State Highway Account upon resolution of the commission. The transfers shall be paid out or disbursed solely for the studies and expenses above mentioned and the preparation of the necessary surveys, plans, specifications, and estimates of cost, and for the construction of the toll bridge and the acquisition of the necessary lands and easements therefor. Any amount of the transfers not so expended shall be returned to the particular portion of the account from which it was transferred and shall be apportioned or allocated from the account and expended as if the transfer had not been made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 214.)
-------------------------------------------

30683.

The amounts transferred pursuant to Section 30682 shall be repaid to the respective accounts from which transferred, but no repayment thereof shall be required until all obligations issued by the commission for the construction of the toll bridge and all bonds issued for refunding of the bonds and for additions, betterments, and extensions to the toll bridge, including new and additional approaches thereto, have been fully redeemed and paid, and then only out of the tolls and revenue received from the operation of the toll bridge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 215.)
-------------------------------------------

30684.

After all bonds issued for the construction of the toll bridge and all bonds issued for refunding of the bonds and for additions, betterments, and extensions to the toll bridge, including new and additional approaches thereto, have been fully redeemed and paid, the commission shall continue to collect tolls and other revenues for the use of the toll bridge for the purpose of repaying the respective accounts from which money has been transferred pursuant to Section 30682. The amount so repaid to any such account shall be returned to the particular portion of the account from which it was transferred and shall be apportioned or allocated from the account and expended as if the transfer had not been made.

Upon repayment of all the accounts, the bridge shall thereafter be maintained and operated free of tolls or the rate of tolls shall thereafter be so adjusted as to provide a fund of not to exceed the amount necessary for the proper operation, maintenance, and insurance of the toll bridge under economical management.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 216.)
-------------------------------------------

30685.

The cost of operation of the toll bridge, including the cost of insurance against loss of tolls or other revenue therefrom, shall be paid from the tolls and revenue received from the use and operation of said bridge. The cost of physical maintenance, including the cost of insurance of said bridge against all risks, shall be paid by the department as provided in Section 188.3 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

30685.

The commission shall transfer fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) to the Toll Bridge Seismic Retrofit Account in the State Transportation Fund from funds in the Vincent Thomas Toll Bridge Revenue Account.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 327, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Bridges Across Carquinez Straits [30750. - 30751.]

30750.

As used in this article:

(a) “Carquinez Bridge” means those certain bridge spans on Interstate Route 80 across the Carquinez Straits near Crockett, together with any existing or new and additional approaches thereto, necessary or desirable to connect with the present spans or any additional spans and the toll collection facilities to serve both the existing bridge span and any additional spans.

(b) “Benicia-Martinez Bridge” means the toll bridge across the Carquinez Straits on Interstate Route 680 connecting the Cities of Benicia and Martinez, together with any existing or new and additional approaches thereto, necessary or desirable with respect to the present span or any spans and toll collection facilities for the bridge and any additional spans.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30751.

The department is authorized to lay out, acquire, and construct the Carquinez Bridge and the Benicia-Martinez Bridge and to make any modification, improvement, and reconstruction of the bridges as is necessary to adequately handle anticipated traffic and permit the collection of tolls.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Antioch Bridge [30760. - 30761.]

30760.

As used in this article, “Antioch Bridge” means the high-level fixed-span bridge across the San Joaquin River near Antioch together with the approaches thereto and the toll collection facilities for the bridge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30761.

The department is authorized to modify, improve, reconstruct, and remodel the Antioch Bridge as is necessary to adequately handle anticipated traffic and permit the collection of tolls.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. San Francisco-Oakland Rapid Transit Tube [30771. - 30780.]

30771.

As used in this article:

(a) “District” means the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District.

(b) “Rapid transit tube” means a subaqueous tube across San Francisco Bay between the City and County of San Francisco and the County of Alameda, its approaches and fixed transit facilities, including, but not limited to, ventilation towers and equipment, tracks, and electrical distribution, control, lighting, and communication systems for the accommodation of rail rapid transit. The San Francisco terminus of the underwater portion of the rapid transit tube shall be located westward of the shoreline of San Francisco Bay as close thereto as may be reasonably practicable between Howard and Jackson Streets in the City and County of San Francisco. The Alameda County terminus shall be the Southern Pacific mole or as close thereto as may be reasonably practicable.

(c) “Approaches” means all facilities between the terminus in Alameda County and the first station thereafter in the county for the discharge of passengers, and all facilities between the terminus in the City and County of San Francisco and the easterly end of the passenger platform of the Montgomery Street Station defined as “approaches” in the agreement between the department and the district, dated March 3, 1966.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 227.)
-------------------------------------------

30775.1.

On and after the date revenues are made available to the district under Article 2 (commencing with Section 29140) of Chapter 7 of Part 2 of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code and notwithstanding any agreement between the district and the department to the contrary, the district shall have sole control and responsibility over all matters relating to the rapid transit tube, including construction. On and after the imposition of such transactions and use tax, the department shall have no authority or responsibility relative to the tube, including actions taken or disbursements made by the district relative thereto whether made heretofore or hereafter. Upon completion and acceptance by the district of all or any portion of the tube, and notwithstanding any existing agreement between the district and the department, title to any such portion shall immediately vest in the district, and the state shall have no further obligation or responsibility therefor except its obligations to aid in the financing of the rapid transit tube as provided in this article. Funds to be provided to the district hereunder shall be furnished to the district by the department in accordance with schedules furnished by the district to the department from time to time showing the amounts reasonably required by the district from time to time to meet its accruing obligations for costs of the rapid transit tube and approaches. Such schedules shall be furnished monthly or at such other intervals as the district and the department may agree upon.

The department is authorized to retain in a fund established for such purpose money to cover contingent liabilities including claims arising out of the construction contracts. The district may deposit in such fund moneys derived from Article 2 (commencing with Section 29140) of Chapter 7 of Part 2 of Division 10 of the Public Utilities Code or other moneys or credits available to the district. The amounts to be retained in such fund and disbursements from such fund shall be at the direction of the department. The department, however, shall not retain a greater amount than is necessary to cover anticipated claims by the contractor or moneys necessary to meet estimated contingent liabilities. In determining the amount of claims and contingencies, the department shall, to the greatest extent possible, base such amounts upon evaluation of the amount of claims and contingent items prepared by the district.

The department shall to the extent practicable invest moneys in such fund in bonds and obligations eligible for investment of surplus state money. All moneys placed in such fund by the district which are not derived from revenues of the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge Toll Revenue Fund shall be invested separately and any interest thereon shall be credited to the district. The department shall return to the district any such moneys not necessary to cover claims or contingencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

30776.

All the provisions of the California Toll Bridge Authority Act (Chapter 1 (commencing at Section 30000) of this division) applicable to toll highway crossings shall apply to the activities of the department and the authority in connection with the rapid transit tube insofar as they are not inconsistent with the provisions of this article. The provisions of said act shall not apply to the district and shall not require or permit the fixing of a toll by the department or the authority for the use of the rapid transit tube. The district shall have the sole and exclusive right to the use of the rapid transit tube in the absence of an agreement between the district and any other party for any use by such other party on payment of appropriate compensation to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1755.)
-------------------------------------------

30778.

(a) The annual tolls and revenues of the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge, or so much thereof as may be necessary, after provision for the payment in full of all annual costs of operation, insurance, and other expenses of the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge, and after payment or provision for payment in full of all of the costs of any project involving the San Mateo-Hayward Bridge, shall be pledged and used to finance and pay for the cost of the construction of additional highway crossings across San Francisco Bay as provided below, and for such other purposes as may be authorized by law, including, but not limited to, payment of the principal of, and interest and premiums, if any, on, and provision for security of, the revenue bonds of the commission issued pursuant to this article and the California Toll Bridge Authority Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 30000)).

(b) Bonds for the construction of additional highway crossings across San Francisco Bay may be authorized and issued by the commission. In the event the commission shall be authorized to refund any and all bonds issued for the construction of other toll bridges or toll highway crossings of San Francisco Bay and the rivers and streams tributary thereto in the Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, Marin, Napa, San Mateo, Santa Clara, Solano, and Sonoma and the City and County of San Francisco, then and in that event the commission is authorized to issue all of the bonds to be issued for the additional highway crossings over San Francisco Bay and the refunding bonds in a single authorization, and to pledge to the payment of the principal of, and interest on, all of the bonds and any provisions for the further security thereof, including reserve fund or sinking fund payments or otherwise, all of the revenues of all of the bridges of San Francisco Bay and the rivers and streams tributary thereto, including the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge, the San Mateo-Hayward Bridge, the Dumbarton Bridge, the Carquinez Strait Bridges, the Benicia-Martinez Bridge, the Antioch Bridge, and the Richmond-San Rafael Bridge, or any thereof as may be determined by the commission, together with revenues of the additional crossings to be constructed across San Francisco Bay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 234.)
-------------------------------------------

30780.

The rapid transit tube shall be repaired, maintained and operated, and insured against such risks and in such amount as the district deems proper by or at the expense of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1755.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. San Mateo-Hayward and Dumbarton Bridges [30790. - 30791.]

30790.

(a) The San Mateo-Hayward Bridge is the bridge, together with necessary approaches, across San Francisco Bay connecting the County of San Mateo near the City of San Mateo with the County of Alameda near Mount Eden. The approaches to the bridge shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) An approach along Route 92 to Route 101, including the interchange between Routes 92 and 101, in the County of San Mateo.

(2) An approach along Route 92 to a point at or near the junction of Routes 17 and 92, in the County of Alameda.

(3) An interchange between Routes 17 and 238, in the County of Alameda.

(4) The portion of Route 17 between Route 92 and Route 238, in the County of Alameda.

(b) The Dumbarton Bridge is the vehicle bridge across San Francisco Bay, together with necessary approaches, connecting the County of San Mateo near Menlo Park with the County of Alameda near Fremont.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 910.)
-------------------------------------------

30791.

The department is authorized to modify, improve, reconstruct, and remodel the San Mateo-Hayward Bridge and the Dumbarton Bridge as is necessary to adequately handle anticipated traffic and permit the collection of tolls.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. San Diego-Coronado Bridge [30796. - 30796.10.]

30796.

The San Diego-Coronado Bridge is the bridge, together with necessary approaches, across San Diego Bay connecting the Cities of San Diego and Coronado.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1774.)
-------------------------------------------

30796.1.

The department shall endeavor to obtain funds from the federal government and from other nonstate sources to conduct a study on the feasibility of maintaining and operating a ferry system for nonvehicular traffic, such as pedestrian traffic, between the Cities of San Diego and Coronado. The department shall conduct such study only if adequate funding is obtained.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1774.)
-------------------------------------------

30796.2.

Upon a finding by the department that the operation of a ferry system for nonvehicular traffic between the Cities of San Diego and Coronado is feasible, the authority shall promptly take the necessary steps to secure the consent of the holders of the outstanding bonds secured by the revenues of the bridge to the operation of such a ferry system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1774.)
-------------------------------------------

30796.3.

Upon the authority securing the consent of the bondholders to the operation of a ferry system for nonvehicular traffic between the Cities of San Diego and Coronado, the department shall grant a franchise for the operation of such a ferry system at the earliest possible date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1774.)
-------------------------------------------

30796.4.

The net revenues received by the department from the operation of the ferry system shall be deposited in the San Diego-Coronado Toll Bridge Revenue Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1774.)
-------------------------------------------

30796.7.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the San Diego Association of Governments, on behalf of the state, may impose a toll on vehicles crossing the San Diego-Coronado Bridge. The toll shall be established by the association after conducting at least one public hearing.

(b) The authority of the commission relative to tolls on the bridge is hereby transferred to the San Diego Association of Governments. All tolls on the bridge shall be at the rates established by the San Diego Association of Governments, except that at no time shall the rate of toll for class 1 vehicles exceed one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per vehicle.

(c) (1) The revenues from any tolls imposed on the bridge shall be used first for expenses related to the collection of tolls, including, but not limited to, the installation and operation of an automated toll collection system, if that system is installed by the association, and operation of the bridge, including, but not limited to, reimbursement for any operating and retrofitting costs and, second, for improvements to the bridge and its approaches. Tolls shall be established at an amount which will generate revenue sufficient to meet the requirements set forth in this paragraph, as determined by the department. Maintenance of the bridge shall be funded by the state under Section 188.4.

(2) The revenues from any tolls imposed on the bridge may also be used for costs incurred by the San Diego Association of Governments in administering this section and for any of the following:

(A) Transportation services that either increase the capacity of the bridge and its approaches or reduce the demand for travel in the transportation corridor that includes the bridge.

(B) Alternative forms of transportation, within the transportation corridor that includes the bridge, that reduce congestion and air pollution, including, but not limited to, ferry service and public transit.

(C) Capital improvements and related expenditures within the transportation corridor for construction and maintenance of bikeways.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “transportation corridor” means the San Diego-Coronado Bridge and its approaches which extend from Route 5 in the City of San Diego to the North Island Naval Air Station via Route 282, and to the Naval Amphibious Base via Route 75 in the City of Coronado.

(e) All money deposited in the San Diego-Coronado Toll Bridge Revenue Fund prior to March 26, 1992, and not expended, encumbered, or programmed before January 1, 1994, is appropriated to the Controller for allocation to the San Diego Association of Governments for the purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(f) The San Diego Association of Governments shall include in the regional transportation improvement program, and every update thereof, an expenditure plan specifying the projects and programs that are to be funded with toll revenues.

(g) If the San Diego Association of Governments, on behalf of the state, imposes tolls pursuant to subdivision (a), it shall reimburse the department for costs incurred by the department in operating the bridge, collecting tolls, and performing other related services. The association and the department shall enter into an agreement which provides for the full reimbursement of the department for all operating costs.

(h) The San Diego Association of Governments shall prepare an annual audit of expenditures that are funded with toll revenues. The audit shall be funded solely with toll revenues and shall not include expenditures made by the department. The association shall review the annual financial report on state-owned toll bridges that is prepared by the department for revenues collected under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 729, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

30796.8.

The department may permit any class of vehicles to use the bridge on a credit basis without posting the security required by Section 30158.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1151, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

30796.9.

(a) The San Diego Association of Governments shall deposit thirty-three million dollars ($33,000,000) in the Toll Bridge Seismic Retrofit Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(b) Maintenance of the San Diego-Coronado Bridge shall be funded by the state pursuant to Section 188.4.

(c) Of the thirty-three million dollars ($33,000,000) in local funds to be paid by the San Diego Association of Governments as the local toll authority for the San Diego-Coronado Bridge, not less than ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be paid from local toll revenue reserve funds. The balance of funds shall be paid from toll bridge revenue bonds, as specified in Section 30796.10, supported by toll revenue. This revenue shall consist of the net toll revenue gained from shifting the cost of bridge maintenance to be funded by the state pursuant to Section 188.4 and by all or part of the remaining toll revenues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 207.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

30796.10.

(a) The San Diego Association of Governments may issue bonds payable from the revenues derived from the tolls imposed on the bridge. The bonds may be issued by the San Diego Association of Governments at any time, and from time to time payable from the revenues from the tolls. The bonds shall be referred to as “toll bridge revenue bonds.” The association shall be an instrumentality of the state for the purposes of those issuances.

(b) The revenues from the tolls on the bridge shall be subject to a statutory lien in favor of the bondholders to secure all amounts due on the bonds and in favor of any provider of credit enhancement for the bonds to secure all amounts due to the provider with respect to those bonds. The lien shall immediately attach to the toll revenues and be effective, binding, and enforceable against the San Diego Association of Governments, its successors, creditors, and all others asserting the rights therein, irrespective of whether those parties have notice of the lien and without the need for any physical delivery, recordation, filing, or further act. The toll revenues shall remain subject to the lien until all bonds are paid in full or provisions are made therefor. The bridge shall not become a free public bridge until that time.

(c) The liens on toll revenues created by this section shall be subject to expenditures for the collection of tolls, if those expenditures are not otherwise provided for by statute, including, but not limited to, expenditures relating to the installation and operation of an automated toll collection system, if that system is installed by the association, but shall have priority over the use of any of the toll revenues for improvements undertaken pursuant to the authorization contained in subdivision (c) of Section 30796.7.

(d) Toll bridge revenue bonds shall be issued pursuant to a resolution adopted at any time, and from time to time, by the San Diego Association of Governments by a majority vote of the governing board of the association.

The San Diego Association of Governments may from time to time, issue bonds in accordance with the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), for the purpose of constructing, improving, or equipping the bridge, or for any of the purposes authorized by Section 30796.7 for the expenditure of toll revenues. Operation of the bridge shall constitute an “enterprise” within the meaning of Section 54309 of the Government Code, and the San Diego Association of Governments shall constitute a “local agency” within the meaning of Section 54307 of the Government Code. Article 3 (commencing with Section 54380) of Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code shall not apply to the issuance and sale of bonds pursuant to this section. Instead, the San Diego Association of Governments shall authorize the issuance of bonds by resolution, which resolution shall specify all of the following:

(1) The purposes for which the bonds are to be issued.

(2) The maximum principal amount of the bonds.

(3) The maximum term for the bonds.

(e) The maximum rate of interest to be payable upon the bond which interest rates shall not exceed the maximum rate specified in Section 53531 of the Government Code. The rate may be either fixed or variable and shall be payable at the times and in the manner specified in the resolution.

(f) Interest on any bonds issued pursuant to this section shall at all times be free from state personal income tax and corporate income tax.

(g) Any bonds issued pursuant to this section are a legal investment for all trust funds; for the funds of insurance companies, commercial and savings banks, and trust companies; and for state school funds. Whenever any money or funds may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be invested in bonds of cities, counties, school districts, or other districts within the state, those funds may be invested in the bonds issued pursuant to this section, and whenever bonds of cities, counties, school districts, or other districts within this state may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be used as security for the performance of any act or the deposit of any public money, the bonds issued pursuant to this section may be so used. The provisions of this section are in addition to all other laws relating to legal investments and shall be controlling as the latest expression of the Legislature with respect thereto.
